apertium-zul.zul.twoc
! We should probably have all the possible 
! symbols on the surface (not morphotactic!) side here
Alphabet

 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z 

 %<n%> %<sg%> %<pl%>

 %<SI%_1%-2%> %<SI%_1a%-2a%>
 %<SI%_3%-4%> %<SI%_5%-6%>
 %<SI%_7%-8%> %<SI%_9%-1%0%>
 %<SI%_11%-1%0%> %<SI%_14%>
 %<SI%_15%> %<SI%_17%>


 %[%+um%]:0  %[%+aba%]:0  
 %[%+in%]:0  %[%+izin%]:0  


;

Sets 

Verb = %<v%> ;

Rules 

"Match prefixes +um"
%[%+um%]:0 /<=  _ (:*) %[%+aba%]:0 ; 

"Match prefixes +aba"
%[%+aba%]:0 /<= _ (:*) %[%+um%]:0 ;

"Match prefixes +in"
%[%+in%]:0 /<=  _ (:*) %[%+izin%]:0 ; 

"Match prefixes +izin"
%[%+izin%]:0 /<= _ (:*) %[%+in%]:0 ;


! [+aba]ntu<n><SI_1-2>[+aba]<pl>:abantu
